California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Upon the receipt by a participating county of responsive construction bids, the board and the department may borrow funds for project costs after the project has been certified pursuant to Section 1970 from the Pooled Money Investment Account pursuant to Sections 16312 and 16313 of the Government Code, or from any other appropriate source. In the event any of the revenue bonds, notes, or bond anticipation notes authorized by this chapter are not sold, the department shall commit a sufficient amount of its support appropriation to repay any loans made for an approved project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 17.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1973.

(a) The board may issue up to two hundred ninety-four million one hundred one thousand five hundred forty-five dollars ($294,101,545) in revenue bonds, notes, or bond anticipation notes, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 15830) of Part 10b of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to finance the acquisition, design, renovation, or construction, and a reasonable construction reserve, of approved local youthful offender rehabilitative facilities described in Section 1971, and any additional amount authorized under Section 15849.6 of the Government Code to pay for the cost of financing.

(b) Proceeds from the revenue bonds, notes, or bond anticipation notes may be utilized to reimburse a participating county for the costs of acquisition, design, and
 construction for approved projects.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds derived pursuant to this section are continuously appropriated for purposes of this article.

(d) No projects shall be commenced after June 30, 2017, but projects already commenced may be completed and financed through the issuance of bonds pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 19, Sec. 25.   (AB 111)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1974.

With the consent of the board, the department, and a participating county are authorized to enter into leases or subleases, as lessor or lessee, for any property or approved project and are further authorized to enter into contracts or other agreements for the use, maintenance, and operation of the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility in order to facilitate the financing authorized by this article. In those leases, subleases, or other agreements, the participating county shall agree to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the State of California for any and all claims and losses accruing and resulting from or arising out of the participating county’s use and occupancy of the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 30.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Operative September 1, 2007, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

1975.

(a) The authority shall adhere to its duly adopted regulations for the approval or disapproval of local youthful offender rehabilitative facilities. The authority also shall consider cost-effectiveness in determining approval or disapproval. No state moneys shall be encumbered in contracts let by a participating county until either final architectural plans and specifications have been approved by the authority, and subsequent construction bids have been received, or documents prepared by a participating county pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 20133 of the Public Contract Code have been approved by the Corrections Standards Authority, and a design-build contract has been awarded pursuant to that section. The review and
 approval of plans, specifications, or other documents by the authority are for the purpose of ensuring proper administration of moneys and determination of whether the project specifications comply with law and regulation. The authority may require changes in construction materials to enhance safety and security if materials proposed at the time of final plans and specifications are not essential and customary as used statewide for facilities of the same security level. Participating counties are responsible for the acquisition, design, renovation, construction, staffing, operation, repair, and maintenance of the project.

(b) The authority shall establish minimum standards and funding schedules and procedures, which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Certification by a participating county of project site control through either fee
 simple ownership of the site or comparable long-term possession of the site, and right of access to the project sufficient to ensure undisturbed use and possession.

(2) Documentation of need for the project.

(3) A written project proposal.

(4) Submittal of a staffing plan for the project, including operational cost projections and documentation that the local youthful offender rehabilitative facility will be able to be safety staffed and operated within 90 days of completion.

(5) Submittal of architectural drawings, which shall be approved by the authority for compliance with minimum youthful offender rehabilitation facility standards and which also shall be approved by the State Fire Marshal for compliance with fire safety and life safety
 requirements.

(6) Documentation evidencing the filing by a participating county of a final notice of determination on its environmental impact report.

(7) Provisions intended to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds, notes, or bond anticipation notes issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 729, Sec. 22.   (AB 1628)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1976.

Participating county matching funds for projects funded under this article shall be a minimum of 25 percent of the total project costs. The authority may reduce matching fund requirements for participating counties with a general population below 200,000 upon petition by a participating county to the authority requesting a lower level of matching funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 175, Sec. 30.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Operative September 1, 2007, by Sec. 37 of Ch. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

1977.

In support of state funding authorized by this article, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Population levels in local juvenile offender facilities across the state have dramatically increased.

(b) Although capacity in local juvenile offender rehabilitation and incarceration facilities has been added during the last decade, those facilities still face capacity problems, and aging facilities need to be repaired or replaced.

(c) Insufficient capacity at local juvenile offender rehabilitation and incarceration facilities may create risks to the public safety as well as a loss to the state of potentially productive members of society.

(d) By expanding local juvenile offender rehabilitation and incarceration facilities, this funding will serve a critical state purpose, which purpose represents valuable consideration in exchange for this state action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 16, Sec. 20.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1978.

In the event that a county that has been conditionally awarded financing, pursuant to this article, later determines that participating with other counties in a shared regional facility would provide an improved solution to the county’s needs and the needs of other counties, the original county may apply to the Board of State and Community Corrections (BSCC) for redirection of the conditional award to another county that will be the lead county for the regional facility, in conjunction with the original county and, potentially, other counties. If the BSCC determines, based on findings submitted by the regional consortium of counties, that the redirection will result in cost savings, regional efficiencies, increased services, and improved outcomes, and that the design of the joint facility will enhance program delivery, health
 and mental health services, and the safety and security of minors, the BSCC may authorize the redirection of the conditional award. Redirection may only be considered prior to any approval or establishment of the project by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 627, Sec. 3.   (SB 365)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.6. Juvenile Reentry Grant [1980. - 1985.]

1980.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the local supervision of persons discharged from the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice or at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 10.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1981.

(a) There is hereby established a Juvenile Reentry Fund. Moneys allocated for local supervision of persons discharged from the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice or discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 authorized in Sections 1983 and 1984 shall be deposited into this fund from the General Fund. Any moneys deposited into this fund shall be administered by the Controller and the share calculated for each county probation department shall be transferred to its Juvenile Reentry Fund authorized in subdivision (b).

(b) Each county is hereby authorized to establish in each county treasury a Juvenile Reentry Fund to receive all amounts allocated to that county probation department for purposes of implementing this chapter.

(c) Allocations from the Juvenile Reentry Fund shall be expended exclusively to address local program needs for persons discharged from the custody of the Division of Juvenile Justice or discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875. County probation departments, in expending the Juvenile Reentry Grant allocation, shall provide evidence-based supervision and detention practices and rehabilitative
 services to persons who are subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court who were committed to and discharged from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice or discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875. “Evidence-based” refers to supervision and detention policies, procedures, programs, and practices demonstrated by scientific research to reduce recidivism among individuals on probation or under postrelease supervision.

(d) Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not be used by local agencies to supplant other funding for Public Safety Services, as defined in Section 36 of Article XIII of the California
 Constitution.

(e) The funding provided under this chapter is intended to provide payment in full for all local government costs of the supervision, programming, education, incarceration or any other cost resulting from persons discharged from custody or held in local facilities pursuant to the provisions of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1982.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall provide an annual report, commencing July 10, 2011, and annually thereafter, for the preceding fiscal year, through the 2023–24 fiscal year, with information sorted by county, to the Department of Finance that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Identifying information of each ward discharged from a Division of Juvenile Justice facility on or after 90 days after the enactment of this section, excluding parole violators who were originally released to parole on or after 90 days after the enactment of this section, and the date each ward was released to
 local supervision.

(2) The name of each parolee recalled pursuant to Section 731.1 on or after 90 days after the enactment of this section, the remaining term of supervision, and the date each ward was recalled.

(b) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, and annually thereafter, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall provide a report for the preceding fiscal year, with information sorted by county, to the Department of
 Finance. The Office of Youth and Community Restoration may audit the information included in the annual report required by this section. A county that does not submit data pursuant to this subdivision may not receive funding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1984. The information in the report shall include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Identifying information of each ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875, and the date each ward was released to local supervision.

(2) Identifying information of each discharged ward returned to a local juvenile detention facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision that occurred during the first 24 months after the ward’s initial release to local supervision, and the number of months each violator was housed in a local juvenile detention facility.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “identifying information” means a unique identifier, which may include the ward’s initials, that allows the Department of Finance to reconcile information provided
 pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) while preserving the confidentiality of the ward. The reports created pursuant to this section shall not be considered record information within the meaning of Section 11075 of the Penal Code or Section 825 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 12.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1983.

For each fiscal year, beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter, the Director of Finance shall calculate the Juvenile Reentry Grant and the allocation for each county probation department, pursuant to Section 1984 and shall report those findings to the Controller. The Controller shall make an allocation from the Juvenile Reentry Grant to each county probation department in accordance with the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 729, Sec. 23.   (AB 1628)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section operative January 17, 2011, pursuant to Section 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1984.

(a) The amount allocated to each county probation department from the Juvenile Reentry Grant Special Account established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 30025 of the Government Code shall be allocated in monthly installments. In each fiscal year, the amount allocated to each county
 probation department from the Juvenile Reentry Grant Special Account shall be distributed pursuant to the criteria set forth in
 this section.

(b) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, funds shall be distributed pursuant to the following criteria:

(1) For wards discharged from the Division of Juvenile Justice, the following criteria shall apply:

(A) Consistent with Section 1766, funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged to the jurisdiction of the court and ordered by the court to be supervised by local county probation for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of discharged wards supervised at the local level. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for 24 months.

(B) Consistent with Sections 208.5 and 1767.35,
 additional funding, beyond the initial fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) provided pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall not be allocated to counties for discharged wards who are housed in county jail or in any other county correctional facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year.

(C) Consistent with Sections 208.5 and 1767.35, funds shall be allocated in the amount of one hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($115,000) on an average daily population basis per discharged ward transferred to a local juvenile facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year
 based on the actual number of discharged wards housed in a local juvenile detention facility or court-ordered placement facility where the costs of the housing are not reimbursable to the county through Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, or Medi-Cal. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for the actual number of months the ward is housed in a facility up to 12 months. This funding shall not be provided for wards housed in a jail under any circumstances.

(D) Consistent with Section 1766, funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average daily population basis per discharged ward transferred to the county of commitment for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of wards transferred. For each ward transferred on and after July 1, 2014, this funding shall be provided for the remaining duration of the term of juvenile court jurisdiction, not to exceed 24 months.

(E) Consistent with Sections 208.5 and 1767.35, additional funding, beyond the initial fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) provided pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall not be allocated to counties for discharged wards who are housed in a state juvenile facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year.

(2) For wards discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875, the following
 criteria shall apply:

(A) Funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 to the jurisdiction of the court and ordered by the court to be supervised by local county probation for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of discharged wards supervised at the local level. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for 24 months.

(B) Additional funding, beyond the initial fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) provided pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall not be allocated to counties for wards discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 who are housed in county jail
 or in any other county correctional facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year.

(C) Consistent with Section 208.5, funds shall be allocated in the amount of one hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($115,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 who is transferred to a local juvenile facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of discharged wards housed in a local juvenile detention facility or court-ordered placement facility where the costs of the housing are not reimbursable to the county through Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, or Medi-Cal. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for the actual number of months the ward is housed in a facility up to 12
 months. This funding shall not be provided for wards housed in a jail under any circumstances.

(D) Funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 transferred to the county of commitment for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of wards transferred. This funding shall be provided for the remaining duration of the term of juvenile court jurisdiction, not to exceed 24 months.

(c) Commencing with the 2025–2026 fiscal year, funds shall be distributed pursuant to the following criteria:

(1) Funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average
 daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 to the jurisdiction of the court and ordered by the court to be supervised by local county probation for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of discharged wards supervised at the local level. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for 24 months.

(2) Additional funding, beyond the initial fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) provided pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall not be allocated to counties for wards discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 who are housed in county jail or in any other county correctional facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year.

(3) Consistent with Section 208.5, funds shall be allocated in the amount of one hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($115,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 who is transferred to a local juvenile facility for violating a condition of court-ordered supervision during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of discharged wards housed in a local juvenile detention facility or court-ordered placement facility where the costs of the housing are not reimbursable to the county through Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act, or Medi-Cal. For each discharged ward, this funding shall be provided for the actual number of months the ward is housed in a facility up to 12 months. This funding shall not be provided for wards housed in a jail under any circumstances.

(4) Funds shall be allocated in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) on an average daily population basis per ward discharged at the conclusion of their baseline term or modified baseline term pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 875 to the county of commitment for monitoring and services during the previous fiscal year based on the actual number of wards transferred. This funding shall be provided for the remaining duration of the term of juvenile court jurisdiction, not to exceed 24 months.

(d) In each fiscal year, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 30029.11 of the Government Code, the Department of Finance shall use the criteria outlined in
 this section to determine each county’s allocation as a percentage of the funds deposited in the Juvenile Reentry Grant Special Account. Actual allocations provided to counties pursuant to subdivisions this section shall vary based on the amount of funds deposited in the Juvenile Reentry Grant Special Account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30028.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1985.

This chapter shall become operative on the 90th day after the enactment of the act adding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 729, Sec. 23.   (AB 1628)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (Jan. 17, 2011) for Chapter 1.6, commencing with Section 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.7. Juvenile Justice Realignment Block Grant [1990. - 1995.]

1990.

(a) The Juvenile Justice Realignment Block Grant program is hereby established for the purpose of providing county based custody, care, and supervision of youth who are realigned from the state Division of Juvenile Justice or who were otherwise eligible for commitment to the Division of Juvenile Justice prior to its closure.

(b) The realignment target population for the grant program shall be defined as youth who were eligible for commitment to the Division of Juvenile Justice prior to its closure, and shall further be defined as persons who are adjudicated to be a ward of the juvenile court based on an offense described in subdivision (b) of Section 707 or on offense described in Section 290.008 of the Penal
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 49.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1991.

(a) There shall be an allocation to the county for use by the county to provide appropriate rehabilitative housing and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990. In making allocations, the county board of supervisors shall consider the plan required in Section 1995. Any entity receiving a direct allocation of funding from the county board of supervisors under this section for any secure residential placement for court-ordered detention will be subject to
 and shall comply with existing law and regulations, including, but not limited to, Section 209. A county board of supervisors shall not allocate funding to any juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility that is, or at any time during the prior fiscal year was, unsuitable and used for the confinement of youth on any day when the facility was prohibited by law from being used for the confinement of youth pursuant to Section 209. A county board of supervisors may withhold funding from any entity that is, or at any time during the prior fiscal year was, operating an unsuitable juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility and is confining or did confine one or more youth in the unsuitable facility on any day when the facility was prohibited by law from being used for confinement of youth pursuant to Section 209. This section does not preclude a county board of supervisors from allocating funding to an entity if either the entity ceases confining youth in an
 unsuitable facility, or the unsuitable facility, after reinspection, is found to have remedied the conditions that rendered the facility unsuitable and is found to be a suitable place for confinement of youth. With the exception of county probation departments, a local public agency that has primary responsibility for prosecuting or making arrests or detentions shall not provide rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990 or receive funding pursuant to this section:

(1) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, thirty-nine million nine hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($39,949,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990 based on a projected average daily population of 177.6 wards. The by-county distribution shall be based on 30 percent of
 the per-county percentage of the average number of wards committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, as of December 31, 2018, June 30, 2019, and December 31, 2019, 50 percent of the by-county distribution of juveniles adjudicated for certain violent and serious felony crime categories per 2018 Juvenile Court and Probation Statistical System data, updated annually based on the most recently available data, and 20 percent of the by-county distribution of all individuals between 10 and 17 years of age, inclusive, from the preceding calendar year.

(2) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, one hundred eighteen million three hundred thirty-nine thousand dollars ($118,339,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990. The by-county distribution is based on the per-county percentage
 referenced in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and a projected average daily population of 526 wards.

(3) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, one hundred ninety-two million thirty-seven thousand dollars ($192,037,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990. The by-county distribution is based on the per-county percentage referenced in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and a projected average daily population of 853.5 wards.

(4) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, two hundred eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($208,800,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990. The by-county distribution is based on the per-county percentage
 referenced in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and a projected average daily population of 928 wards.

(5) For the 2025–26 fiscal
 year, two hundred eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($208,800,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990. The by-county distribution is based on the per-county percentage referenced in paragraph (1) and a projected average daily population of 928 wards.

(6) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, two hundred eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($208,800,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990 and the by-county distribution shall be based on the following:

(A) Twenty-five percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(B) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total
 number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were not committed to a secure youth treatment facility, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(C) Thirty-five percent of the per-county percentage of all individuals between 10 and 17 years of age, inclusive, from the preceding calendar year.

(D) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were committed to a secure youth treatment facility and then transferred to a less restrictive program, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200.

(7) For the 2027–28 fiscal year, two hundred eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($208,800,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990 and the by-county distribution shall be based on the following:

(A) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(B) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were not committed to a
 secure youth treatment facility, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(C) Thirty-five percent of the per-county percentage of all individuals between 10 and 17 years of age, inclusive, from the preceding calendar year.

(D) Ten percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were committed to a secure youth treatment facility and then transferred to a less restrictive program, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200.

(E) Fifteen percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards
 adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were committed to a secure youth treatment facility and then transferred to a less restrictive program that is not in a facility regulated by Subchapter 5 (commencing with Section 1300) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200.

(8) For the 2028–29 fiscal year and ongoing, two hundred eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($208,800,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to provide appropriate rehabilitative and supervision services for the population specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1990 and the by-county distribution shall be based on the following:

(A) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total
 number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(B) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were not committed to a secure youth treatment facility, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200, from the preceding calendar year.

(C) Thirty-five percent of the per-county percentage of all individuals between 10 and 17 years of age, inclusive, from the preceding calendar year.

(D) Five percent of the per-county
 percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were committed to a secure youth treatment facility and then transferred to a less restrictive program, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200.

(E) Twenty percent of the per-county percentage of the total number of wards adjudicated for an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 who were committed to a secure youth treatment facility and then transferred to a less restrictive program that is not in a facility regulated by Subchapter 5 (commencing with Section 1300) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, per county data submissions to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 2200.

(9) By January 10, 2030, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall review the formula described in this section and report to the Legislature with an assessment of the formula’s efficacy in meeting the Legislature’s intent to implement public health approaches to support positive youth development and outcomes, build the capacity of a continuum of community-based approaches, and reduce recidivism. This assessment may be included in the annual report required pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 2200.

(10) The Department of Finance shall increase to no more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) the award amount for any county whose allocation as calculated pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4),
 (5), (6), (7), and (8) totals less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The appropriation in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8) shall be increased by the amounts needed to bring each county’s allocation to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(b) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, the allocations determined by paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (10) of subdivision (a) shall be adjusted annually by a rate commensurate with any applicable growth in the
 Juvenile Justice Growth Special Account in the prior fiscal year. Each year, this growth shall become additive to the next year’s base allocation. Any applicable growth amounts pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated based on a schedule provided by the Department of Finance, as described in subdivision (c), to the Controller consistent with the timelines for other 2011 Public Safety Realignment growth allocations.

(c) By July 1, 2021, and by July 31 annually thereafter, the Department of Finance shall allocate the amount calculated in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (10) of subdivision (a) from the General Fund and provide a schedule for the allocation of funds among counties to the Controller. The controller shall
 allocate these funds no later than August 31 each year, consistent with the schedule provided by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   (AB 118)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.

(a) To be eligible for funding described in Section 1991, a county shall create a subcommittee of the multiagency juvenile justice coordinating council, as described in Section 749.22, to develop a plan describing the facilities, programs, placements, services, supervision and reentry strategies that are needed to provide appropriate rehabilitation and supervision services for the population described in subdivision (b) of Section 1990.

(b) The subcommittee shall be composed of the chief probation officer, as chair or cochair, and one representative each from the district attorney’s office, the public defender’s office, the department of social services, the department of mental health, the county office of education or a school district, and a representative
 from the court. The subcommittee shall also include no fewer than three community members who shall be defined as individuals who have experience providing community-based youth services, youth justice advocates with expertise and knowledge of the juvenile justice system, or have been directly involved in the juvenile justice system. Any member may be selected as cochair of the subcommittee using a process determined by the subcommittee.

(c) The plan described in subdivision (a) shall be developed with review and participation of the subcommittee community members as defined in subdivision (b) and shall be approved by a majority of the subcommittee.

(d) The plan described in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following elements:

(1) A description of the realignment target population in the county that is to be